Utah statutes.
17-52-102.   Forms of county government -- County commission form required unless another is adopted.

(1)  Each county shall operate under one of the following forms of county government:

(a)  the county commission form under Section 17-52-501;

(b)  the expanded county commission form under Section 17-52-502;

(c)  the county executive and council form under Section 17-52-504; or

(d)  the council-manager form under Section 17-52-505.

(2)  Unless it adopts another form of government as provided in this chapter, each county shall operate under the county commission form of government under Section 17-52-501.



Amended by Chapter 241, 2001 General Session

